New York, session 2025-2026, S8429.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 16.03 of the mental hygiene law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision (h) to read as follows: 3 (h) Any provider of services that holds an operating certificate 4 pursuant to subdivision (a) of this section shall be authorized to 5 provide behavioral analysis services, in accordance with article one 6 hundred sixty-seven of the education law and with persons licensed to 7 provide mental health counseling pursuant to section eighty-four hundred 8 two of the education law, so long as the professional providing such 9 services is acting within their lawful scope of practice. Additionally, 10 any such provider that holds an operating certificate pursuant to subdi- 11 vision (a) of this section shall also be authorized to employ or 12 contract with persons licensed or certified to practice applied behavior 13 analysis pursuant to article one hundred sixty-seven of the education 14 law and with persons licensed to provide mental health counseling pursu- 15 ant to section eighty-four hundred two of the education law. 16 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD13191-05-6